Utah statutes.
73-3-23.   Replacement of water.

In all cases of appropriations of underground water the right of replacement is hereby granted to any junior appropriator whose appropriation may diminish the quantity or injuriously affect the quality of appropriated underground water in which the right to the use thereof has been established as provided by law. No replacement may be made until application in writing has been made to and approved by the state engineer. In all cases replacement shall be at the sole cost and expense of the applicant and subject to such rules and regulations as the state engineer may prescribe. The right of eminent domain is hereby granted to any applicant for the purpose of replacement as provided herein.

